mn_MN.aff
FLAG long
SFX 6C Y 19
SFX 6C 0 нуудынд/00 [шглмс]
SFX 6C ав вуудынд/00 ав
SFX 6C ад дуудынд/00 ад
SFX 6C ан нуудынд/00 ан
SFX 6C ар руудынд/00 ар
SFX 6C ац цуудынд/00 ац
SFX 6C ач чуудынд/00 ач
SFX 6C ид дуудынд/00 ид
SFX 6C ин нуудынд/00 ин
SFX 6C ир руудынд/00 ир
SFX 6C ит туудынд/00 [жчш]ит
SFX 6C их хуудынд/00 их
SFX 6C иц цуудынд/00 иц
SFX 6C ов вуудынд/00 ов
SFX 6C од дуудынд/00 од
SFX 6C он нуудынд/00 он
SFX 6C ор руудынд/00 ор
SFX 6C оц цуудынд/00 оц
SFX 6C оч чуудынд/00 оч

SFX 6D Y 10
SFX 6D 0 уудынд/00 [врсбпф]
SFX 6D аж жуудынд/00 аж
SFX 6D ал луудынд/00 ал
SFX 6D ам муудынд/00 ам
SFX 6D ач чуудынд/00 ач
SFX 6D аш шуудынд/00 аш
SFX 6D ил луудынд/00 ил
SFX 6D им муудынд/00 им
SFX 6D их хуудынд/00 их
SFX 6D ич чуудынд/00 ич

SFX 6E Y 5
SFX 6E 0 нуудынд/00 [ийеэ]
SFX 6E ав вуудынд/00 ав
SFX 6E аг гуудынд/00 аг
SFX 6E ас суудынд/00 ас
SFX 6E иг гуудынд/00 иг

SFX 7A Y 6
SFX 7A 0 нуудынд/00 [^ьяён]
SFX 7A 0 удынд/00 [яё]
SFX 7A 0 уудынд/00 [^ч].н
SFX 7A 0 уудынд/00 он
SFX 7A н дынд/00 ч.н
SFX 7A ь инуудынд/00 ь

SFX 7B Y 11
SFX 7B 0 гүүдийнд/00 [ейү]
SFX 7B 0 гүүдийнд/00 н
SFX 7B 0 гүүдийнд/00 ээ
SFX 7B 0 гүүдийнд/00 өө
SFX 7B 0 үдийнд/00 и
SFX 7B 0 үүдийнд/00 [^эөиегнжчшйяеёү]
SFX 7B 0 үүдийнд/00 [жчш]
SFX 7B 0 үүдийнд/00 г
SFX 7B ь иүдийнд/00 ь
SFX 7B э үүдийнд/00 [^э]э
SFX 7B ө үүдийнд/00 [^ө]ө

SFX 7C Y 19
SFX 7C 0 нуудынд/00 [шглмс]
SFX 7C ав вуудынд/00 ав
SFX 7C ад дуудынд/00 ад
SFX 7C ан нуудынд/00 ан
SFX 7C ар руудынд/00 ар
SFX 7C ац цуудынд/00 ац
SFX 7C ач чуудынд/00 ач
SFX 7C ид дуудынд/00 ид
SFX 7C ин нуудынд/00 ин
SFX 7C ир руудынд/00 ир
SFX 7C ит туудынд/00 [жчш]ит
SFX 7C их хуудынд/00 их
SFX 7C иц цуудынд/00 иц
SFX 7C ов вуудынд/00 ов
SFX 7C од дуудынд/00 од
SFX 7C он нуудынд/00 он
SFX 7C ор руудынд/00 ор
SFX 7C оц цуудынд/00 оц
SFX 7C оч чуудынд/00 оч

SFX 7D Y 10
SFX 7D 0 уудынд/00 [врсбпф]
SFX 7D ил луудынд/00 ил
SFX 7D им муудынд/00 им
SFX 7D их хуудынд/00 их
SFX 7D ич чуудынд/00 ич
SFX 7D ож жуудынд/00 ож
SFX 7D ол луудынд/00 ол
SFX 7D ом муудынд/00 ом
SFX 7D оч чуудынд/00 оч
SFX 7D ош шуудынд/00 ош

SFX 7E Y 5
SFX 7E 0 нуудынд/00 [ийео]
SFX 7E иг гуудынд/00 иг
SFX 7E ов вуудынд/00 ов
SFX 7E ог гуудынд/00 ог
SFX 7E ос суудынд/00 ос

SFX 8A Y 4
SFX 8A 0 нүүдийнд/03 [^ьен]
SFX 8A 0 үдийнд/03 е
SFX 8A 0 үүдийнд/03 [^ч].н
SFX 8A н дийнд/03 ч.н

SFX 8C Y 19
SFX 8C 0 нүүдийнд/03 [шглмс]
SFX 8C ид дүүдийнд/03 ид
SFX 8C ин нүүдийнд/03 ин
SFX 8C ир рүүдийнд/03 ир
SFX 8C ит түүдийнд/03 [жчш]ит
SFX 8C их хүүдийнд/03 их
SFX 8C иц цүүдийнд/03 иц
SFX 8C эв вүүдийнд/03 эв
SFX 8C эд дүүдийнд/03 эд
SFX 8C эн нүүдийнд/03 эн
SFX 8C эр рүүдийнд/03 эр
SFX 8C эц цүүдийнд/03 эц
SFX 8C эч чүүдийнд/03 эч
SFX 8C өв вүүдийнд/03 өв
SFX 8C өд дүүдийнд/03 өд
SFX 8C өн нүүдийнд/03 өн
SFX 8C өр рүүдийнд/03 өр
SFX 8C өц цүүдийнд/03 өц
SFX 8C өч чүүдийнд/03 өч

SFX 8D Y 10
SFX 8D 0 үүдийнд/03 [врсбпф]
SFX 8D ил лүүдийнд/03 ил
SFX 8D им мүүдийнд/03 им
SFX 8D их хүүдийнд/03 их
SFX 8D ич чүүдийнд/03 ич
SFX 8D өж жүүдийнд/03 өж
SFX 8D өл лүүдийнд/03 өл
SFX 8D өм мүүдийнд/03 өм
SFX 8D өч чүүдийнд/03 өч
SFX 8D өш шүүдийнд/03 өш

SFX 8E Y 4
SFX 8E иг гүүдийнд/03 иг
SFX 8E өв вүүдийнд/03 өв
SFX 8E өг гүүдийнд/03 өг
SFX 8E өс сүүдийнд/03 өс

SFX 9A Y 4
SFX 9A 0 нүүдийнд/03 [^ьен]
SFX 9A 0 үдийнд/03 е
SFX 9A 0 үүдийнд/03 [^ч].н
SFX 9A н дийнд/03 ч.н

SFX 9C Y 19
SFX 9C 0 нүүдийнд/03 [шглмс]
SFX 9C ид дүүдийнд/03 ид
SFX 9C ин нүүдийнд/03 ин
SFX 9C ир рүүдийнд/03 ир
SFX 9C ит түүдийнд/03 [жчш]ит
SFX 9C их хүүдийнд/03 их
SFX 9C иц цүүдийнд/03 иц
SFX 9C эв вүүдийнд/03 эв
SFX 9C эд дүүдийнд/03 эд
SFX 9C эн нүүдийнд/03 эн
SFX 9C эр рүүдийнд/03 эр
SFX 9C эц цүүдийнд/03 эц
SFX 9C эч чүүдийнд/03 эч
SFX 9C өв вүүдийнд/03 өв
SFX 9C өд дүүдийнд/03 өд
SFX 9C өн нүүдийнд/03 өн
SFX 9C өр рүүдийнд/03 өр
SFX 9C өц цүүдийнд/03 өц
SFX 9C өч чүүдийнд/03 өч

SFX 9D Y 10
SFX 9D 0 үүдийнд/03 [врсбпф]
SFX 9D ил лүүдийнд/03 ил
SFX 9D им мүүдийнд/03 им
SFX 9D их хүүдийнд/03 их
SFX 9D ич чүүдийнд/03 ич
SFX 9D эж жүүдийнд/03 эж
SFX 9D эл лүүдийнд/03 эл
SFX 9D эм мүүдийнд/03 эм
SFX 9D эч чүүдийнд/03 эч
SFX 9D эш шүүдийнд/03 эш

SFX 9E Y 5
SFX 9E 0 нүүдийнд/03 [ийеэ]
SFX 9E иг гүүдийнд/03 иг
SFX 9E эв вүүдийнд/03 эв
SFX 9E эг гүүдийнд/03 эг
SFX 9E эс сүүдийнд/03 эс

SFX A6 Y 10
SFX A6 0 нд й
SFX A6 0 ныд [^йьян]
SFX A6 0 ыд н
SFX A6 0 ынд я
SFX A6 ь иныд ь
SFX A6 0 ндаа й
SFX A6 0 ныдаа [^йьян]
SFX A6 0 ыдаа н
SFX A6 0 ындаа я
SFX A6 ь иныдаа ь 

SFX A7 Y 10
SFX A7 0 нд й
SFX A7 0 ныд [^йьён]
SFX A7 0 ыд н
SFX A7 0 ынд ё
SFX A7 ь иныд ь
SFX A7 0 ндоо й
SFX A7 0 ныдоо [^йьён]
SFX A7 0 ыдоо н
SFX A7 0 ындоо ё
SFX A7 ь иныдоо ь

SFX A8 Y 8
SFX A8 0 ийд н
SFX A8 0 ийнд е
SFX A8 0 нд й
SFX A8 0 нийд [^йен]
SFX A8 0 ийдөө н
SFX A8 0 ийндөө е
SFX A8 0 ндөө й
SFX A8 0 нийдөө [^йен]

SFX A9 Y 8
SFX A9 0 ийд н
SFX A9 0 ийнд е
SFX A9 0 нд й
SFX A9 0 нийд [^йен]
SFX A9 0 ийдээ н
SFX A9 0 ийндээ е
SFX A9 0 ндээ й
SFX A9 0 нийдээ [^йен]

SFX B6 Y 16
SFX B6 0 гийнд [ауя][ау]
SFX B6 0 гийнд [не]
SFX B6 0 ийнд [жчшгк]
SFX B6 0 йнд и
SFX B6 0 ныд [йя]
SFX B6 0 ынд [^ауиьгнжчшкейя]
SFX B6 а ынд [^а]а
SFX B6 ь ийнд ь
SFX B6 0 гийндаа [ауя][ау]
SFX B6 0 гийндаа [не]
SFX B6 0 ийндаа [жчшгк]
SFX B6 0 йндаа и
SFX B6 0 ныдаа [йя]
SFX B6 0 ындаа [^ауиьгнжчшкейя]
SFX B6 а ындаа [^а]а
SFX B6 ь ийндаа ь

SFX B7 Y 16
SFX B7 0 гийнд [не]
SFX B7 0 гийнд оо
SFX B7 0 ийнд [жчшгк]
SFX B7 0 йнд и
SFX B7 0 ныд [йё]
SFX B7 0 ынд [^оиьгнжчшкейё]
SFX B7 о ынд [^о]о
SFX B7 ь ийнд ь
SFX B7 0 гийндоо [не]
SFX B7 0 гийндоо оо
SFX B7 0 ийндоо [жчшгк]
SFX B7 0 йндоо и
SFX B7 0 ныдоо [йё]
SFX B7 0 ындоо [^оиьгнжчшкейё]
SFX B7 о ындоо [^о]о
SFX B7 ь ийндоо ь

SFX B8 Y 12
SFX B8 0 гийнд н
SFX B8 0 гийнд өө
SFX B8 0 ийнд [^өинйе]
SFX B8 0 йнд и
SFX B8 0 нийд [ей]
SFX B8 ө ийнд [^ө]ө
SFX B8 0 гийндөө н
SFX B8 0 гийндөө өө
SFX B8 0 ийндөө [^өинйе]
SFX B8 0 йндөө и
SFX B8 0 нийдөө [ей]
SFX B8 ө ийндөө [^ө]ө

SFX B9 Y 14
SFX B9 0 гийнд [не]
SFX B9 0 гийнд [эүе][эү]
SFX B9 0 ийнд [^эиүньйе]
SFX B9 0 йнд и
SFX B9 0 нийд [йе]
SFX B9 ь ийнд ь
SFX B9 э ийнд [^э]э
SFX B9 0 гийндээ [не]
SFX B9 0 гийндээ [эүе][эү]
SFX B9 0 ийндээ [^эиүньйе]
SFX B9 0 йндээ и
SFX B9 0 нийдээ [йе]
SFX B9 ь ийндээ ь
SFX B9 э ийндээ [^э]э

SFX C6 Y 28
SFX C6 0 ныд [шглмс]
SFX C6 ав вынд ав
SFX C6 ад дынд ад
SFX C6 ан ныд ан
SFX C6 ар рынд ар
SFX C6 ат тынд ат
SFX C6 ах хынд ах
SFX C6 ац цынд ац
SFX C6 ид дынд [жчш]ид
SFX C6 ин ныд [жчш]ин
SFX C6 ир рынд [жчш]ир
SFX C6 ит тынд [жчш]ит
SFX C6 их хынд [жчш]их
SFX C6 иц цынд [жчш]иц
SFX C6 0 ныдаа [шглмс]
SFX C6 ав вындаа ав
SFX C6 ад дындаа ад
SFX C6 ан ныдаа ан
SFX C6 ар рындаа ар
SFX C6 ат тындаа ат
SFX C6 ах хындаа ах
SFX C6 ац цындаа ац
SFX C6 ид дындаа [жчш]ид
SFX C6 ин ныдаа [жчш]ин
SFX C6 ир рындаа [жчш]ир
SFX C6 ит тындаа [жчш]ит
SFX C6 их хындаа [жчш]их
SFX C6 иц цындаа [жчш]иц

SFX C7 Y 28
SFX C7 0 ныд [шглмс]
SFX C7 ид дынд [жчш]ид
SFX C7 ин ныд [жчш]ин
SFX C7 ир рынд [жчш]ир
SFX C7 ит тынд [жчш]ит
SFX C7 их хынд их
SFX C7 иц цынд [жчш]иц
SFX C7 ов вынд ов
SFX C7 од дынд од
SFX C7 он ныд он
SFX C7 ор рынд ор
SFX C7 от тынд от
SFX C7 ох хынд ох
SFX C7 оц цынд оц
SFX C7 0 ныдоо [шглмс]
SFX C7 ид дындоо [жчш]ид
SFX C7 ин ныдоо [жчш]ин
SFX C7 ир рындоо [жчш]ир
SFX C7 ит тындоо [жчш]ит
SFX C7 их хындоо их
SFX C7 иц цындоо [жчш]иц
SFX C7 ов вындоо ов
SFX C7 од дындоо од
SFX C7 он ныдоо он
SFX C7 ор рындоо ор
SFX C7 от тындоо от
SFX C7 ох хындоо ох
SFX C7 оц цындоо оц

SFX C8 Y 28
SFX C8 0 нийд [шглмс]
SFX C8 ид дийнд ид
SFX C8 ин нийд ин
SFX C8 ир рийнд ир
SFX C8 ит тийнд ит
SFX C8 их хийнд их
SFX C8 иц цийнд иц
SFX C8 өв вийнд өв
SFX C8 өд дийнд өд
SFX C8 өн нийд өн
SFX C8 өр рийнд өр
SFX C8 өт тийнд өт
SFX C8 өх хийнд өх
SFX C8 өц цийнд өц
SFX C8 0 нийдөө [шглмс]
SFX C8 ид дийндөө ид
SFX C8 ин нийдөө ин
SFX C8 ир рийндөө ир
SFX C8 ит тийндөө ит
SFX C8 их хийндөө их
SFX C8 иц цийндөө иц
SFX C8 өв вийндөө өв
SFX C8 өд дийндөө өд
SFX C8 өн нийдөө өн
SFX C8 өр рийндөө өр
SFX C8 өт тийндөө өт
SFX C8 өх хийндөө өх
SFX C8 өц цийндөө өц

SFX C9 Y 28
SFX C9 0 нийд [шглмс]
SFX C9 ид дийнд ид
SFX C9 ин нийд ин
SFX C9 ир рийнд ир
SFX C9 ит тийнд ит
SFX C9 их хийнд их
SFX C9 иц цийнд иц
SFX C9 эв вийнд эв
SFX C9 эд дийнд эд
SFX C9 эн нийд эн
SFX C9 эр рийнд эр
SFX C9 эт тийнд эт
SFX C9 эх хийнд эх
SFX C9 эц цийнд эц
SFX C9 0 нийдээ [шглмс]
SFX C9 ид дийндээ ид
SFX C9 ин нийдээ ин
SFX C9 ир рийндээ ир
SFX C9 ит тийндээ ит
SFX C9 их хийндээ их
SFX C9 иц цийндээ иц
SFX C9 эв вийндээ эв
SFX C9 эд дийндээ эд
SFX C9 эн нийдээ эн
SFX C9 эр рийндээ эр
SFX C9 эт тийндээ эт
SFX C9 эх хийндээ эх
SFX C9 эц цийндээ эц

SFX D6 Y 18
SFX D6 0 ынд [врсбпф]
SFX D6 аж жийнд аж
SFX D6 ал лынд ал
SFX D6 ам мынд ам
SFX D6 ач чийнд ач
SFX D6 аш шийнд аш
SFX D6 ил лынд ил
SFX D6 им мынд им
SFX D6 ич чийнд ич
SFX D6 0 ындаа [врсбпф]
SFX D6 аж жийндаа аж
SFX D6 ал лындаа ал
SFX D6 ам мындаа ам
SFX D6 ач чийндаа ач
SFX D6 аш шийндаа аш
SFX D6 ил лындаа ил
SFX D6 им мындаа им
SFX D6 ич чийндаа ич

SFX D7 Y 18
SFX D7 0 ынд [врсбпф]
SFX D7 ил лынд ил
SFX D7 им мынд им
SFX D7 ич чийнд ич
SFX D7 ож жийнд ож
SFX D7 ол лынд ол
SFX D7 ом мынд ом
SFX D7 оч чийнд оч
SFX D7 ош шийнд ош
SFX D7 0 ындоо [врсбпф]
SFX D7 ил лындоо ил
SFX D7 им мындоо им
SFX D7 ич чийндоо ич
SFX D7 ож жийндоо ож
SFX D7 ол лындоо ол
SFX D7 ом мындоо ом
SFX D7 оч чийндоо оч
SFX D7 ош шийндоо ош

SFX D8 Y 18
SFX D8 0 ийнд [врсбпф]
SFX D8 ил лийнд ил
SFX D8 им мийнд им
SFX D8 ич чийнд ич
SFX D8 өж жийнд өж
SFX D8 өл лийнд өл
SFX D8 өм мийнд өм
SFX D8 өч чийнд өч
SFX D8 өш шийнд өш
SFX D8 0 ийндөө [врсбпф]
SFX D8 ил лийндөө ил
SFX D8 им мийндөө им
SFX D8 ич чийндөө ич
SFX D8 өж жийндөө өж
SFX D8 өл лийндөө өл
SFX D8 өм мийндөө өм
SFX D8 өч чийндөө өч
SFX D8 өш шийндөө өш

SFX D9 Y 18
SFX D9 0 ийнд [врсбпф]
SFX D9 ил лийнд ил
SFX D9 им мийнд им
SFX D9 ич чийнд ич
SFX D9 эж жийнд эж
SFX D9 эл лийнд эл
SFX D9 эм мийнд эм
SFX D9 эч чийнд эч
SFX D9 эш шийнд эш
SFX D9 0 ийндээ [врсбпф]
SFX D9 ил лийндээ ил
SFX D9 им мийндээ им
SFX D9 ич чийндээ ич
SFX D9 эж жийндээ эж
SFX D9 эл лийндээ эл
SFX D9 эм мийндээ эм
SFX D9 эч чийндээ эч
SFX D9 эш шийндээ эш

SFX E6 Y 12
SFX E6 0 ныд [ийеа]
SFX E6 ав вынд ав
SFX E6 аг гийнд аг
SFX E6 ас сынд ас
SFX E6 иг гийнд иг
SFX E6 ис сынд ис
SFX E6 0 ныдаа [ийеа]
SFX E6 ав вындаа ав
SFX E6 аг гийндаа аг
SFX E6 ас сындаа ас
SFX E6 иг гийндаа иг
SFX E6 ис сындаа ис

SFX E7 Y 12
SFX E7 0 ныд [ийео]
SFX E7 иг гийнд иг
SFX E7 ис сынд ис
SFX E7 ов вынд ов
SFX E7 ог гийнд ог
SFX E7 ос сынд ос
SFX E7 0 ныдоо [ийео]
SFX E7 иг гийндоо иг
SFX E7 ис сындоо ис
SFX E7 ов вындоо ов
SFX E7 ог гийндоо ог
SFX E7 ос сындоо ос

SFX E8 Y 10
SFX E8 иг гийнд иг
SFX E8 ис сийнд ис
SFX E8 өв вийнд өв
SFX E8 өг гийнд өг
SFX E8 өс сийнд өс
SFX E8 иг гийндөө иг
SFX E8 ис сийндөө ис
SFX E8 өв вийндөө өв
SFX E8 өг гийндөө өг
SFX E8 өс сийндөө өс

SFX E9 Y 12
SFX E9 0 нийд [ийеэ]
SFX E9 иг гийнд иг
SFX E9 ис сийнд ис
SFX E9 эв вийнд эв
SFX E9 эг гийнд эг
SFX E9 эс сийнд эс
SFX E9 0 нийдээ [ийеэ]
SFX E9 иг гийндээ иг
SFX E9 ис сийндээ ис
SFX E9 эв вийндээ эв
SFX E9 эг гийндээ эг
SFX E9 эс сийндээ эс
